Utah statutes.
9-4-917.   Notes, bonds, other obligations -- Not debt liability -- Expenses
payable from funds provided -- Corporation without authority to incur
liability on behalf of state -- Relationship to Governmental Immunity Act of
Utah.
(1) (a)  Notes, bonds, and other obligations issued under this part do not
constitute a debt or liability of this state or of any county, city, town,
village, school district, or any other political subdivision of the state, nor
shall the notes, bonds, or other obligations constitute the loaning of credit
of the state or of any county, city, town, township, district, or any other
political subdivision of the state, nor may the notes, bonds, or other
obligations be payable from funds other than those of the corporation.
(b)  All notes, bonds, or other obligations shall contain on their face a
statement to the effect that:
(i)  the corporation is obligated to pay the note, bond, or obligation solely
from the revenues or other funds of the corporation;
(ii)  neither this state nor any political subdivision of it is obligated to
pay the note, bond, or obligation; and
(iii)  neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of this state or any
political subdivision of it is pledged to the payment of principal, or
redemption price of, or the interest on the notes, bonds, or other
obligations.
(2)  All expenses incurred in carrying out this act shall be payable solely
from funds provided under this part, and nothing in this part shall be
construed to authorize the corporation to incur indebtedness or liability on
behalf of or payable by this state or any political subdivision of it.
(3) (a)  Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, shall apply
to the corporation.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), no claim may be brought against the
state, any public official or employee of the state, another public entity, or
any public official or employee of another public entity, based on or arising
from:
(i)  any failure or alleged failure to fulfill a contractual obligation of the
corporation;
(ii)  any act or failure to act of the corporation or any of its trustees,
officers, employees, agents, or representatives; or
(iii)  any failure of the corporation to comply with the requirements of any
law or regulation.
(c)  The provisions of Subsection (3)(b) do not apply to a claim of a current
or former officer or employee of the corporation for the retirement or
insurance benefits.
